Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.130

Requisites of petition—Effect of favorable vote.

A petition containing the demand for the submission of the proposed charter amendment or for an election to be held for the purpose of electing a board of freeholders for the purpose of preparing a new charter for the city as provided in RCW 35.22.140 shall be filed with the city clerk and each signer shall write his or her place of residence after his or her signature. This and RCW 35.22.120 do not deprive city councils of the right to submit proposed charter amendments but affords a concurrent and additional method of submission.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2044; 1967 c 123 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.130. Prior: (i) 1903 c 186 s 2; RRS s 8964. (ii) 1903 c 186 s 3; RRS s 8965.]